Utah statutes.
16-10a-703.   Court-ordered meeting.
(1)  The district court of the county in this state where a corporation's
principal office is located or, if it has no principal office in this state,
the district court for Salt Lake County may summarily order a meeting of
shareholders to be held:
(a)  on application of any shareholder of the corporation entitled to
participate in an annual meeting or any director of the corporation if an
annual meeting was not held within 15 months after its last annual meeting, or
if there has been no annual meeting, the date of incorporation; or
(b)  on application of any person who participated in a call of or demand for
a special meeting effective under Subsection 16-10a-702(1) if:
(i)  notice of the special meeting was not given within 60 days after the date
of the call or the date the last of the demands necessary to require the
calling of the meeting was delivered to the corporation pursuant to Subsection
16-10a-702(1)(b), as the case may be; or
(ii)  the special meeting was not held in accordance with the notice.
(2)  The court may fix the time and place of the meeting, state whether or not
it is an annual or special meeting, determine the shares entitled to
participate in the meeting, specify a record date for determining shareholders
entitled to notice of and to vote at the meeting, prescribe the form and
content of the meeting notice, fix the quorum required for specific matters to
be considered at the meeting, or direct that the votes represented at the
meeting constitute a quorum for action on those matters, and enter other
orders necessary or appropriate to accomplish the purpose or purposes of
holding the meeting.
